frontend/public/dictionaries/en_US/en_US.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwzESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWZ'
NOSUGGEST !

# Basic plural rules
SFX S Y 1
SFX S   0     s          [^sxz]
SFX S   0     es         [sxz]

# Handle words ending in 'y'
SFX Y Y 1
SFX Y   y     ies        [^aeiou]y

# Past tense rules
SFX D Y 4
SFX D   0     d          e
SFX D   0     ed         [^e]
SFX D   y     ied        [^aeiou]y
SFX D   0     ed         [^y]

# Present participle rules
SFX G Y 3
SFX G   e     ing        e
SFX G   0     ing        [^e]
SFX G   0     ing        [^e]

# Comparative rules
SFX R Y 3
SFX R   0     er         [^y]
SFX R   y     ier        [^aeiou]y
SFX R   0     r          e

# Superlative rules
SFX T Y 3
SFX T   0     est        [^y]
SFX T   y     iest       [^aeiou]y
SFX T   0     st         e
